Hawaii statutes.
[§342G-31 Guidelines.] The process of
county and state integrated solid waste management planning shall be expedited
to the greatest degree possible. The department, within six months of
July 1, 1991, shall issue guidelines for the development of county plans.
The draft guidelines shall be circulated to the counties for review and comment
not less than forty-five days before their issuance. [L 1991, c 324, pt of §2]

Revision Note

"July 1, 1991" substituted for "the
effective date of this chapter".

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next